Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 3. Formation; Certificate of Limited Partnership

Failure to comply with chapter results in nonformation of partnership. —

If parties intend to form a limited partnership, the failure to comply with this chapter would not result in the formation of a general partnership. Rather, such noncompliance would result only in the nonformation of the limited partnership. In re Westover Hills, Ltd., 46 B.R. 300, 1985 Bankr. LEXIS 6828 (Bankr. D. Wyo. 1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

59A Am. Jur. 2d Partnership §§ 1249 to 1278.

68 C.J.S. Partnership §§ 406 to 418.

§ 17-14-301.
Certificate of limited partnership.

In order to form a limited partnership a certificate of limited partnership shall be executed and filed in the office of the secretary of state. The certificate shall set forth:

The name of the limited partnership;

Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 45, § 2.

The address of the office and the name and address of the agent for service of process required to be maintained by W.S.

17-14-205

;

The name and the business address of each general partner;

The amount of cash and a description and statement of the agreed value of the other property or services contributed or to be contributed in the future;

through (xii) Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 45, § 2.

The latest date upon which the limited partnership is to dissolve;

Whether the limited partnership is a limited liability limited partnership; and

Any other matters the partners determine to include therein.

A limited partnership is formed at the time of the filing of the certificate of limited partnership in the office of the secretary of state or at any later time specified in the certificate of limited partnership if, in either case, there has been substantial compliance with the requirements of this section.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 153, § 1; 1995, ch. 45, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 38, § 1; 2008, ch. 116, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, redesignated former (a)(xiv) as (a)(xv) and inserted (a)(xiv).

The 2008 amendment,

made a stylistic change.

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

Limited-partner status not lost where certificate erroneously listing general-partner status amended. —

Where, when parties realized that the certificate of limited partnership had erroneously listed them as a general, rather than as a limited, partner they caused an appropriate certificate of amendment to be executed and filed, the parties did not lose their intended status as a limited partner. In re Westover Hills, Ltd., 46 B.R. 300, 1985 Bankr. LEXIS 6828 (Bankr. D. Wyo. 1985).

Cited in

N. Fork Land & Cattle, LLLP v. First Am. Title Ins.
Co., 2015 WY 150,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Nov. 24, 2015).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Statute requiring “mercantile partnerships” to post names of members of firm as applicable to limited partnership only, 42 ALR2d 516.

Limited partnership: sufficiency of procedure for designating or admitting additional general partner, 6 ALR4th 1277.

Library References.

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
92.03 (Matthew Bender).

§ 17-14-302.
Amendment of certificate.

A certificate of limited partnership is amended by filing a certificate of amendment thereto in the office of the secretary of state. The certificate shall set forth:

The name of the limited partnership;

The date of filing the certificate; and

The amendment to the certificate.

Within thirty (30) days after the occurrence of any of the following events and except as provided by subsection (f) of this section, an amendment to a certificate of limited partnership reflecting the occurrence of the event shall be filed:

Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 45, § 2.

The admission of a new general partner;

The withdrawal of a general partner; or

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 145, § 2.

The election of all the partners to become a limited liability limited partnership.

A general partner who becomes aware that any statement in a certificate of limited partnership was false when made or that any arrangements or other facts described have changed, making the certificate inaccurate in any respect, shall promptly amend the certificate.

A certificate of limited partnership may be amended at any time for any other proper purpose the general partners determine.

A person is not liable because an amendment to a certificate of limited partnership has not been filed to reflect the occurrence of any event referred to in subsection (b) of this section if the amendment is filed within the periods [period] specified in subsection (b) or (f) of this section, whichever applies.

An amendment to a certificate of limited partnership reflecting the occurrence of any event specified by subsection (b) of this section for a partnership comprised of ten (10) partners or less, who are natural persons, may be filed annually instead of within the thirty (30) day period prescribed by subsection (b) of this section. The amendment certificate shall reflect all events specified by subsection (b) of this section which occurred during the calendar year and shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state no later than January 31 of the year following the year for which the amendment certificate applies.

A restated certificate of limited partnership may be executed and filed in the same manner as a certificate of amendment.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 153, § 1; 1983, ch. 53, § 1; 1995, ch. 45, §§ 1, 2; 1999, ch. 145, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 38, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added (b)(v) and made related changes.

Insured. —

In a title
insurance dispute, a limited liability partnership was an insured
because it automatically took ownership of the property when it converted
to a Wyoming limited liability partnership, amended its certificate
of limited partnership to change its name, and withdrew its registration
as a Colorado limited liability limited partnership. The ordinary
meaning of a transfer by operation of law was one that did not involve
an exchange of money or other equivalent consideration. N. Fork Land & Cattle, LLLP v. First Am. Title Ins. Co., 2015 WY 150, 362 P.3d 341,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Wyo. 2015).

§ 17-14-303.
Cancellation of certificate.

A certificate of limited partnership shall be cancelled upon the dissolution and the commencement of winding up of the partnership or at any other time there are no limited partners. A certificate of cancellation shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state and set forth:

The name of the limited partnership;

The date of filing of its certificate of limited partnership;

The reason for filing the certificate of cancellation;

The effective date (which shall be a date certain) of cancellation if it is not to be effective upon the filing of the certificate; and

Any other information the general partners filing the certificate determine.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 153, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 17-14-304.
Execution of certificates.

Each certificate required by this article to be filed in the office of the secretary of state shall be executed in the following manner:

An original certificate of limited partnership shall be signed by all general partners;

A certificate of amendment shall be signed by at least one (1) general partner and by each other general partner designated in the certificate as a new general partner; and

A certificate of cancellation shall be signed by all general partners.

Any person may sign a certificate by an attorney-in-fact, but a power of attorney to sign a certificate relating to the admission of a general partner shall specifically describe the admission.

The execution of a certificate by a general partner constitutes an affirmation under the penalties of perjury that the facts stated therein are true.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 153, § 1; 1995, ch. 45, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to perjury in judicial, legislative or administrative proceedings, see §

6-5-301

.

§ 17-14-305.
Execution by judicial act.

If a person required by W.S.

17-14-304

to execute any certificate fails or refuses to do so, any other person who is adversely affected by the failure or refusal, may petition the district court to direct the execution of the certificate. If the court finds that it is proper for the certificate to be executed and that any person so designated has failed or refused to execute the certificate, it shall order the secretary of state to record an appropriate certificate.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 153, § 1; 1995, ch. 45, § 1.

§ 17-14-306.
Filing in office of secretary of state.

Two (2) signed copies of the certificate of limited partnership and of any certificates of amendment or cancellation (or of any judicial decree of amendment or cancellation) shall be delivered to the secretary of state. A person who executes a certificate as an agent or fiduciary need not exhibit evidence of his authority as a prerequisite to filing. Unless the secretary of state finds that any certificate does not conform to law, upon receipt of all filing fees required by law he shall:

Endorse on each duplicate original the word “Filed” and the day, month and year of the filing thereof;

File one (1) duplicate original in his office; and

Return the other duplicate original to the person who filed it or his representative.

Upon the filing of a certificate of amendment (or judicial decree of amendment) in the office of the secretary of state, the certificate of limited partnership shall be amended as set forth therein, and upon the effective date of a certificate of cancellation (or a judicial decree thereof), the certificate of limited partnership is cancelled.

If the secretary of state refuses to file a certificate under subsection (a) of this section, the secretary of state shall return it to the person who delivered it or to the person’s representative within fifteen (15) days after the document was delivered, together with a brief, written explanation of the reason for the refusal.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 153, § 1; 2021 ch. 21, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added (c).

§ 17-14-307.
Liability for false statement in certificate.

If any certificate of limited partnership or certificate of amendment or cancellation contains a false statement, one who suffers loss by reliance on the statement may recover damages for the loss from:

Any person who executes the certificate, or causes another to execute it on his behalf, and knew, and any general partner who knew or should have known, the statement to be false at the time the certificate was executed; and

Any general partner who thereafter knows or should have known that any arrangement or other fact described in the certificate has changed, making the statement inaccurate in any respect within a sufficient time before the statement was relied upon reasonably to have enabled that general partner to cancel or amend the certificate, or to file a petition for its cancellation or amendment under W.S.

17-14-305

.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 153, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability for false information in certificate of limited partnership under Uniform Limited Partnership Act, 34 ALR2d 1454.

§ 17-14-308.
Scope of notice.

The fact that a certificate of limited partnership is on file in the office of the secretary of state is notice that the partnership is a limited partnership and the persons designated therein as general partners are general partners, but it is not notice of any other fact.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 153, § 1; 1995, ch. 45, § 1.

Cited

in

In re Westover Hills Ltd., 46 B.R. 300, 1985 Bankr. LEXIS 6828 (Bankr. D. Wyo. 1985).

§ 17-14-309.
Delivery of certificates to limited partners.

Upon the return by the secretary of state pursuant to W.S.

17-14-306

of a certificate marked “Filed”, the general partners shall promptly deliver or mail a copy of the certificate of limited partnership and each certificate to each limited partner unless the partnership agreement provides otherwise.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 153, § 1.